Maryland, session 2025, HB1240.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1240*

HOUSE BILL 1240
SUBTITLE 25. ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE.
24–2501.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE” MEANS A MACHINE–BASED SYSTEM THAT:
(1) CAN, FOR A GIVEN SET OF HUMAN–DEFINED OBJECTIVES, MAKE
PREDICTIONS, RECOMMENDATIONS, OR DECISIONS INFLUENCING REAL OR VIRTUAL
ENVIRONMENTS;
(2) USES MACHINE AND HUMAN–BASED INPUTS TO PERCEIVE REAL
AND VIRTUAL ENVIRONMENTS AND ABSTRACTS THOSE PERCEPTIONS INTO MODELS
THROUGH ANALYSIS IN AN AUTOMATED MANNER; AND
(3) USES MODEL INFERENCE TO FORMULATE OPTIONS FOR
INFORMATION OR ACTION.
(C) (1) “HEALTH CARE PROVIDER” MEANS:
(I) A PERSON WHO IS LICENSED, CERTIFIED, OR OTHERWISE
AUTHORIZED UNDER THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE OR § 13–516 OF THE
EDUCATION ARTICLE TO PROVIDE HEALTH CARE IN THE ORDINARY COURSE OF
BUSINESS OR PRACTICE OF A PROFESSION OR IN AN APPROVED EDUCATION OR
TRAINING PROGRAM; OR
(II) A FACILITY WHERE HEALTH CARE IS PROVIDED TO
PATIENTS OR RECIPIENTS, INCLUDING:
1. A FACILITY AS DEFINED IN § 10–101 OF THIS ARTICLE;
2. A HOSPITAL AS DEFINED IN § 19–301 OF THIS
ARTICLE;
3. A RELATED INSTITUTION AS DEFINED IN § 19–301 OF
THIS ARTICLE;
4. A HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION AS
DEFINED IN § 19–701 OF THIS ARTICLE;
5. AN OUTPATIENT CLINIC;

HOUSE BILL 1240 3
6. A MEDICAL LABORATORY;
7. A COMPREHENSIVE CRISIS RESPONSE CENTER;
8. A CRISIS STABILIZATION CENTER; AND
9. A CRISIS TREATMENT CENTER ESTABLISHED UNDER
§ 7.5–207 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(2) “HEALTH CARE PROVIDER” INCLUDES AN AGENT, AN EMPLOYEE,
AN OFFICER, AND A DIRECTOR OF A FACILITY DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF
THIS SUBSECTION AND AN AGENT AND AN EMPLOYEE OF A PERSON DESCRIBED IN
PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
24–2502.
A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER MAY NOT USE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE IF THE
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE HAS BEEN DESIGNED ONLY TO REDUCE COSTS FOR A
HEALTH CARE PROVIDER AT THE EXPENSE OF REDUCING THE QUALITY OF PATIENT
CARE, DELAYING PATIENT CARE, OR DENYING COVERAGE FOR PATIENT CARE.
24–2503.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2026, EACH HEALTH
CARE PROVIDER THAT USES ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TO DETERMINE OR
INFLUENCE HEALTH CARE DECISIONS SHALL POST ON THE HEALTH CARE
PROVIDER’S WEBSITE DOCUMENTATION DETAILING KEY DATA ABOUT THE
DECISIONS MADE USING ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE IN THE IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING YEAR, INCLUDING:
(1) THRESHOLDS FOR WHEN A DECISION IS REVIEWED BY AN
INDIVIDUAL;
(2) RATES OF DECISIONS OVERTURNED AFTER REVIEW BY AN
INDIVIDUAL;
(3) RATES OF MISDIAGNOSIS;
(4) RATES OF MISCALCULATED DOSAGES OF MEDICINE;
(5) THE NUMBER OF INSTANCES WHEN A SUGGESTED PLAN OF CARE
DISREGARDS A PATIENT’S:

HOUSE BILL 1240
(I) PREEXISTING CONDITION;
(II) MEDICATIONS THAT HAVE RELATIVE CONTRAINDICATIONS
OR ABSOLUTE CONTRAINDICATIONS WITH THE SUGGESTED PLAN; OR
(III) CARE PREFERENCES DUE TO PERSONAL BELIEFS; AND
(6) ANY OTHER DATA REQUIRED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) DATA POSTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL BE ARCHIVED AND REMAIN PUBLICLY AVAILABLE ON THE HEALTH CARE
PROVIDER’S WEBSITE.
(C) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2026, EACH
HEALTH CARE PROVIDER THAT USES ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TO DETERMINE OR
INFLUENCE HEALTH CARE DECISIONS SHALL UNDERGO A THIRD–PARTY AUDIT TO
EVALUATE WHETHER THE HEALTH CARE DECISIONS MADE BY AN ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM:
(I) ALIGN WITH MEDICAL CARE STANDARDS;
(II) MEET ETHICAL STANDARDS; OR
(III) DELAY CARE EXCESSIVELY.
(2) AT THE REQUEST OF THE DEPARTMENT, A HEALTH CARE
PROVIDER SHALL SUBMIT TO THE DEPARTMENT PROOF THAT AN AUDIT WAS
COMPLETED IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
24–2504.
(A) IF A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER VIOLATES THIS SUBTITLE, THE
DEPARTMENT MAY IMPOSE A PENALTY NOT TO EXCEED $10,000 PER OFFENSE.
(B) IN DETERMINING THE AMOUNT OF A PENALTY UNDER SUBSECTION (A)
OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSIDER:
(1) THE TYPE, SEVERITY, AND DURATION OF THE VIOLATION;
(2) WHETHER THE HEALTH CARE PROVIDER KNEW OR SHOULD HAVE
KNOWN OF THE VIOLATION;

HOUSE BILL 1240 5
(3) THE EXTENT TO WHICH THE HEALTH CARE PROVIDER HAS A
HISTORY OF VIOLATIONS; AND
(4) WHETHER THE HEALTH CARE PROVIDER CORRECTED THE
VIOLATION AS SOON AS THE HEALTH CARE PROVIDER KNEW OF THE VIOLATION.
24–2505.
THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SUBTITLE.
Article – Insurance
15–147.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE” MEANS A MACHINE–BASED SYSTEM
THAT:
(I) CAN, FOR A GIVEN SET OF HUMAN–DEFINED OBJECTIVES,
MAKE PREDICTIONS, RECOMMENDATIONS, OR DECISIONS INFLUENCING REAL OR
VIRTUAL ENVIRONMENTS;
(II) USES MACHINE AND HUMAN–BASED INPUTS TO PERCEIVE
REAL AND VIRTUAL ENVIRONMENTS AND ABSTRACTS THOSE PERCEPTIONS INTO
MODELS THROUGH ANALYSIS IN AN AUTOMATED MANNER; AND
(III) USES MODEL INFERENCE TO FORMULATE OPTIONS FOR
INFORMATION OR ACTION.
(3) (I) “CARRIER” MEANS:
1. AN INSURER AUTHORIZED TO SELL HEALTH
INSURANCE;
2. A NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLAN;
3. A HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION;
4. A DENTAL PLAN ORGANIZATION; AND

HOUSE BILL 1240
5. ANY OTHER ENTITY PROVIDING A PLAN OF HEALTH
INSURANCE, HEALTH BENEFITS, OR HEALTH SERVICES AUTHORIZED UNDER THE
INSURANCE ARTICLE OR THE FEDERAL AFFORDABLE CARE ACT.
(II) “CARRIER” INCLUDES THE AGENTS, EMPLOYEES,
OFFICERS, AND DIRECTORS OF AN ENTITY DESCRIBED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH.
(B) A CARRIER MAY NOT USE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE IF THE ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE HAS BEEN DESIGNED ONLY TO REDUCE COSTS FOR A CARRIER AT
THE EXPENSE OF REDUCING THE QUALITY OF PATIENT CARE, DELAYING PATIENT
CARE, OR DENYING COVERAGE FOR PATIENT CARE.
(C) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2026, EACH
CARRIER THAT USES ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TO DETERMINE OR INFLUENCE
HEALTH CARE DECISIONS SHALL POST ON THE CARRIER’S WEBSITE
DOCUMENTATION DETAILING KEY DATA ABOUT THE DECISIONS MADE USING
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE IN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING YEAR, INCLUDING:
(I) THRESHOLDS FOR WHEN A DECISION IS REVIEWED BY AN
INDIVIDUAL;
(II) RATES OF DECISIONS OVERTURNED AFTER REVIEW BY AN
INDIVIDUAL;
(III) DENIAL RATES;
(IV) CRITERIA USED FOR APPROVALS OR DENIALS; AND
(V) ANY OTHER DATA REQUIRED BY THE COMMISSIONER.
(2) DATA POSTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE ARCHIVED AND REMAIN PUBLICLY AVAILABLE ON THE
CARRIER’S WEBSITE.
(D) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2026, EACH
CARRIER THAT USES ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TO DETERMINE OR INFLUENCE
HEALTH CARE DECISIONS SHALL UNDERGO A THIRD–PARTY AUDIT TO EVALUATE
WHETHER THE HEALTH CARE DECISIONS MADE BY AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
SYSTEM:
(I) ALIGN WITH MEDICAL CARE STANDARDS;

HOUSE BILL 1240 7
(II) MEET ETHICAL STANDARDS; OR
(III) DELAY CARE EXCESSIVELY.
(2) AT THE REQUEST OF THE COMMISSIONER, A CARRIER SHALL
SUBMIT PROOF TO THE COMMISSIONER THAT AN AUDIT WAS COMPLETED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(E) (1) IF A CARRIER VIOLATES THIS SUBTITLE, THE COMMISSIONER MAY
IMPOSE A PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $10,000 PER OFFENSE.
(2) IN DETERMINING THE AMOUNT OF A PENALTY UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL CONSIDER:
(I) THE TYPE, SEVERITY, AND DURATION OF THE VIOLATION;
(II) WHETHER THE CARRIER KNEW OR SHOULD HAVE KNOWN OF
THE VIOLATION;
(III) THE EXTENT TO WHICH THE CARRIER HAS A HISTORY OF
VIOLATIONS; AND
(IV) WHETHER THE CARRIER CORRECTED THE VIOLATION AS
SOON AS THE CARRIER KNEW OF THE VIOLATION.
(F) THE COMMISSIONER MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.